District of Columbia statutes.
29-916

Voting provisions — Application to voting by mail or electronic mail.

If the articles or bylaws have provided for voting by mail or by electronic mail, any provision of this chapter referring to votes cast by the members must be construed to include the votes cast by mail or by electronic mail.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(8), 59 DCR 13171
2001 Ed., § 29-916.
1981 Ed., § 29-1116.
1973 Ed., § 29-816.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.